Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2203.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3502(c)(2)(ii) and 3701(b)(2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3502. Burglary.* * *(c) Grading.--* * *(2) As follows:* * *(ii) If the actor's intent upon entering the building, structure or portion under subparagraph (i) is to commit theft of a controlled substance or designer 123456789101112131415161718192021 drug as those terms are defined in section 2 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of a firearm, burglary is a felony of the first degree.* * *§ 3701. Robbery.* * *(b) Grading.--* * *(2) If the object of a robbery under paragraph (1) is a controlled substance or designer drug as those terms are defined in section 2 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or is a firearm, robbery is a felony of the first degree.Section 2. The definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302 of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Delinquent act."(1) The term means an act designated a crime under the law of this Commonwealth, or of another state if the act occurred in that state, or under Federal law, or an act which constitutes indirect criminal contempt under Chapter 62A (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation) with respect to sexual violence or 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse) or the failure of 20260HB2203PN2896 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a child to comply with a lawful sentence imposed for a summary offense, in which event notice of the fact shall be certified to the court.(2) The term shall not include:(i) The crime of murder.(ii) Any of the following prohibited conduct where the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and a deadly weapon as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions) was used during the commission of the offense which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as:(A) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape).(B) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(C) Aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault).(D) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery).(E) Robbery of motor vehicle as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3702 (relating to robbery of motor vehicle).(E.1) Robbery as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(b)(2).(E.2) Burglary as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(c)(1) (relating to burglary).(F) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent 20260HB2203PN2896 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assault).(G) Kidnapping as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901 (relating to kidnapping).(H) Voluntary manslaughter.(I) An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit murder or any of these crimes as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 901 (relating to criminal attempt), 902 (relating to criminal solicitation) and 903 (relating to criminal conspiracy).(iii) Any of the following prohibited conduct where the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and has been previously adjudicated delinquent of any of the following prohibited conduct which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as:(A) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121.(B) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123.(C) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii).(D) Robbery of motor vehicle as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3702.(D.1) Robbery as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(b)(2).(D.2) Burglary as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(c)(1).(E) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125.(F) Kidnapping as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901.(G) Voluntary manslaughter.(H) An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to 20260HB2203PN2896 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commit murder or any of these crimes as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 901, 902 and 903.(iv) Summary offenses.(v) A crime committed by a child who has been found guilty in a criminal proceeding for other than a summary offense.* * *Section 3. Sections 6307(b)(1.1)(i)(K) and (ii)(K), 6336(e)(2) and 6355(g)(2) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 6307. Inspection of court files and records.* * *(b) Public availability.--(1.1) The contents of court records and files concerning a child shall not be disclosed to the public unless any of the following apply:(i) The child has been adjudicated delinquent by a court as a result of an act or acts committed when the child was 14 years of age or older and the conduct would have constituted one or more of the following offenses if committed by an adult:* * *(K) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery)[.] or as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(b)(2) . * * *(ii) A petition alleging delinquency has been filed alleging that the child has committed an act or acts subject to a hearing pursuant to section 6336(e) (relating to conduct of hearings) and the child 20260HB2203PN2896 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 previously has been adjudicated delinquent by a court as a result of an act or acts committed when the child was 14 years of age or older and the conduct would have constituted one or more of the following offenses if committed by an adult:* * *(K) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii)[.] or as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(b)(2).* * *§ 6336. Conduct of hearings.* * *(e) Open proceedings.--The general public shall not be excluded from any hearings under this chapter:* * *(2) Pursuant to a petition alleging delinquency where the child was 12 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and where the alleged conduct would have constituted one or more of the following offenses if committed by an adult:(i) Murder.(ii) Voluntary manslaughter.(iii) Aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault).(iv) Arson as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a)(1) (relating to arson and related offenses).(v) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse.(vi) Kidnapping.(vii) Rape.(viii) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)20260HB2203PN2896 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery)[.] or as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(b)(2).(ix) Robbery of motor vehicle.(ix.1) Burglary as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(c)(1) (relating to burglary).(x) Attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses in this paragraph.* * *§ 6355. Transfer to criminal proceedings.* * *(g) Burden of proof.--The burden of establishing by a preponderance of evidence that the public interest is served by the transfer of the case to criminal court and that a child is not amenable to treatment, supervision or rehabilitation as a juvenile shall rest with the Commonwealth unless the following apply:* * *(2) there is a prima facie case that the child committed a delinquent act which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault), robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery) or as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(b)(2), robbery of motor vehicle, burglary as a felony of the first degree as specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(c)(1) (relating to burglary), aggravated indecent assault, kidnapping, voluntary manslaughter, an attempt, 20260HB2203PN2896 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conspiracy or solicitation to commit any of these crimes or an attempt to commit murder as specified in paragraph (2)(ii) of the definition of "delinquent act" in section 6302.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2203PN2896 - 8 - 12345